Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.643, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Animal premises data. (a) Except for farmed Cervidae premises location data collected and maintained under section 35.155, the following data collected and maintained by the Board of Animal Health related to registration and identification of premises and animals under chapter 35, are classified as private or nonpublic: (1) the names and addresses; (2) the location of the premises where animals are kept; and (3) the identification number of the premises or the animal. deleted text begin (b) Except as provided in section 347.58, subdivision 5, data collected and maintained by the Board of Animal Health under sections 347.57 to 347.64 are classified as private or nonpublic. deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end The Board of Animal Health may disclose data collected under paragraph (a) deleted text begin or (b)deleted text end to any person, agency, or to the public if the board determines that the access will aid in the law enforcement process or the protection of public or animal health or safety. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 347.36, is amended to read: 347.36 ADVERTISING. All advertising new text begin pertaining to the sale of animals new text end by any person, firm, or corporation licensed hereunder shall include the number of the current license issued to such licenseenew text begin or a link to a website that includes the number of the current licensenew text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 347.37, is amended to read: 347.37 PUBLIC ACCESS; NOTICE; INSPECTION; ENFORCEMENT. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Inspection and enforcement. new text end new text begin (a) new text end The Board of Animal Health shall cause to be inspected from time to time all kennels and dealers licensed hereunder and all records required by sections 347.31 to 347.40 to be kept by the licensees. new text begin (b) new text end Any duly authorized agent of the board, any sheriff, or sheriff's deputy, or police officer, or humane agent appointed pursuant to section 343.01 is granted the power and the authority to enter upon the premises of any kennel or dealer at any time during the daylight hours for the purposes herein set forth, and for the purposes of inspecting the compliance with the provisions of sections 346.55, 347.31 to 347.40 and the rules issued pursuant thereto, and for the purposes of enforcing sections 346.55, or 347.31 to 347.40; except that humane agents shall not enter upon the premises of a licensed veterinarian acting as a kennel. new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Notice. new text end new text begin (a) new text end Each dealer shall post a conspicuous notice in a format no less than 24 by 36 inches and easily readable by the general public, that states: (1) that the person is a licensed dealer in dogs and cats; (2) that dogs and cats left with the dealer may be used for research purposes; and (3) the hours the dealer is open to the public. The notice must be placed in at least two locations on the premises, one of which must be on or near the exterior mail delivery point and one of which must be at the regularly used point of exchange of dogs and cats. A person may view dogs and cats in the custody of a dealer during the time the premises is open to the public. Dealers are required to be open to the public on a regular basis at least four hours between 7:00 a.m. and 10:00 p.m. on at least four of the seven days of each week including at least one Saturday or Sunday. Any advertisement placed by a dealer seeking dogs or cats must inform the public that dogs and cats brought to the dealer may be used for research purposes. new text begin (b) The board must maintain and post in a timely manner on the board's public website the following information: new text end new text begin (1) a list of kennels and dealers licensed and in good standing under sections 347.31 to 347.40, including all business names that the licensee uses in connection with the sale or adoption of dogs or cats and the total number of animals kept, congregated, or confined in the previous calendar year; new text end new text begin (2) copies of all annual reports, inspection records, and enforcement records from the last five years for each kennel or dealer; and new text end new text begin (3) a list of kennels or dealers whose licenses have expired or have been revoked by the board during the last five years, including all business names that the licensee used in connection with the sale or adoption of dogs or cats and any reasons for revocation. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 347.58, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Inspections. (a) The board must inspect each licensed facility at least annually. The inspection must be with the commercial breeder or an agent of the commercial breeder present. The inspector must submit an inspection report to the board within ten days of each inspection on a form prepared by the board. The inspection report form must list separately each law, rule, regulation, and ordinance the facility is not in compliance with and what correction is required for compliance. The inspection report form must document the animal inventory on the date of the inspectionnew text begin and must contain all business names used by the commercial breeder in connection with the sale of dogs or cats, the facility identification number, the name of the facility, and the city or township in which the facility is locatednew text end . (b) If, after the prelicense inspection, the commercial breeder has two consecutive years of inspections with no violations, the board must inspect the commercial breeder at least every two years. If the commercial breeder has any violations during an inspection or if the board has cause, the board must inspect the commercial breeder at least annually. (c) If a license to operate is suspended, revoked, or denied, the board must be granted access to the facility during normal business hours to verify that it is not operating. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 347.58, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Posting of information. The board must maintain and post in a timely manner on deleted text begin itsdeleted text end new text begin the board's publicnew text end website new text begin the following information:new text end new text begin (1) new text end a list of commercial breeders licensed and in good standing under this sectionnew text begin , including all business names that the licensee uses in connection with the sale of dogs or cats and the total number of animals produced and sold in the previous calendar year;new text end new text begin (2) copies of all annual reports, inspection forms, and enforcement records from the last five years for each commercial breeder; and new text end new text begin (3) a list of commercial breeders whose licenses have expired or have been revoked by the board during the last five years, including all business names that the licensee used in connection with the sale of dogs or cats and any reasons for revocationnew text end .